Arkansas, session 2025, HB1558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The Arkansas Real Estate Commission currently requires an
individual to have a real estate broker license issued through the commission
to rent or lease real property on behalf of an owner;
(2) The knowledge and skills necessary for a property management
broker to protect citizens and the business community can be specialized and
does not require the same skills and knowledge as those for a real estate
broker or salesperson;
(3) A property management broker license could create a higher quality
of property management broker in Arkansas with specialized knowledge;
*LGL025*
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(4) The creation of a property management broker license would reduce
the education burden on individuals who might not otherwise pursue other real
estate broker license occupations and potentially create new jobs; and
(5) The commission is the appropriate entity to license an individual
as a property management broker or as a property management associate.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-42-103 is amended to read as follows:
17-42-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Associate broker” means an individual who has a broker's
license and who is employed by a principal broker, or is associated with a
principal broker as an independent contractor, and who participates in any
activity described in subdivision (10) or subdivision (12) of this section
while under the supervision of a principal broker or executive broker.
(B) An associate broker shall have no supervisory
authority over any other licensee;
(2) “Branch office” means a principal broker's office or
property management broker's office other than his or her principal place of
business;
(3) “Broker's price opinion” means an estimate prepared by a
licensee salesperson or real estate broker that details the probable selling
price of real estate and provides a varying level of detail about the real
estate's condition, market, and neighborhood, and information about sales of
comparable real estate;
(4) “Classroom hour” means a period of at least fifty (50)
minutes, but not more than sixty (60) minutes, of actual classroom
instruction with the an instructor present;
(5) “Continuing education” means postlicensure education derived
from participation in courses in real estate-related subjects that have been
approved by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission or that are not required to
be approved by the commission;
(6) “Continuing education unit” means a period of ten (10)
contact hours of actual classroom instruction with the an instructor present;
(7)(A) “Executive broker” means an individual who:
(i) Has a real estate broker's license;
(ii) Is employed by a principal broker or associated
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
with a principal broker as an independent contractor; and
(iii) Participates in any activity described in
subdivision (10) or subdivision (12) of this section while under the
supervision of a principal broker.
(B) An executive broker may supervise associate brokers
and salespersons;
(8)(A) “Licensee” means an individual who holds any type of
license issued by the commission.
(B) “Licensee” includes a principal broker, an executive
broker, an associate broker, and a salesperson, a property management
associate, and a property management broker.
(C) This chapter does not preclude a licensee from:
(i) Doing business as a:
(a) Professional corporation under § 4-29-101
et seq.; or
(b) Professional limited liability company
under § 4-38-1201 et seq.; or
(ii) Receiving payment from a real estate firm or
principal broker of an earned commission to the licensee's legal business
entity if the licensee earned the commission on behalf of the real estate
firm or principal broker;
(9) “Participate in a real estate auction” means to do any act
or conduct for compensation or the expectation of compensation on behalf of a
seller at auction and designed, intended, or expected to affect the bidding
or results of a real estate auction, including without limitation serving as
an auctioneer or ringman or encouraging, soliciting, or receiving bids;
(10)(A) “Principal broker” means an individual expecting to act
or acting for another for a fee, commission, or other consideration who:
(A)(i) Sells, exchanges, purchases, rents, or leases
real estate;
(B)(ii) Offers to sell, exchange, purchase, rent, or
lease real estate;
(C)(iii) Negotiates, offers, attempts, or agrees to
negotiate the sale, exchange, purchase, rent, or lease of real estate;
(D)(iv) Lists, offers, attempts, or agrees to list
real estate for sale, lease, or exchange;
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(E)(v) Auctions, offers, attempts, or agrees to
auction real estate, or participates in a real estate auction;
(F)(vi) Buys, sells, or assigns or offers to buy,
sell, or assign or otherwise deals in options on real estate or improvements
to real estate;
(G)(vii) Collects, offers, attempts, or agrees to
collect rent for the use of real estate;
(H)(viii) Advertises or holds himself or herself out
as being engaged in the business of buying, selling, exchanging, renting, or
leasing real estate;
(I)(ix) Assists or directs in the procuring of
prospects calculated to result in the sale, exchange, lease, or rent of real
estate;
(J)(x) Assists or directs in the negotiation of any
transaction calculated or intended to result in the sale, exchange, lease, or
rent of real estate;
(K)(xi) Engages in the business of charging an
advance fee in connection with any contract whereby he or she undertakes to
promote the sale or lease of real estate either through its listing in a
publication issued for such a purpose or for referral of information
concerning the real estate to brokers, or both; or
(L)(xii) Performs any of the acts described in this
subdivision (10) as an employee of or on behalf of the owner of, or any
person who has an interest in, real estate;.
(B) A principal broker may perform any act listed in
subdivision (12) of this section;
(11)(A) “Property management associate” means an individual who
has a property management associate license and who is employed by a property
management broker, or is associated with a property management broker as an
independent contractor, and who participates in an activity described in
subdivision (12) of this section while under the supervision of a property
management broker.
(B) A property management associate shall have no
supervisory authority over another licensee;
(12) "Property management broker" means an individual licensed
under this chapter who for a salary, commission, or compensation of any kind
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
or with the intent or expectation of receiving valuable consideration engages
in the business of leasing, renting, or subleasing real estate located in
this state on behalf of an owner, lessor, or potential lessee and who:
(A) Accepts employment by or on behalf of the owner,
lessor, or potential lessee of real estate to promote or conduct the leasing
or subleasing of the real estate;
(B) Negotiates or attempts to negotiate the lease of real
estate located in this state or of the improvements on real estate located in
this state;
(C) Engages in the business of promoting the lease or
rental of real estate located in this state;
(D) Assists in completing real estate lease contracts or
property management agreements;
(E) Procures tenants for owners of real estate located in
this state;
(F) Aids or offers to aid for a fee a person in locating
or obtaining real estate for lease in this state;
(G) Makes the advertising of real property for lease
available by public display to potential tenants;
(H) Shows rental or leased properties to potential
tenants;
(I) In conjunction with property management
responsibilities, acts as a liaison between the owners of real estate and a
tenant or potential tenant;
(J) In conjunction with property management
responsibilities, generally oversees the inspection, maintenance, and upkeep
of leased real estate belonging to others;
(K) In conjunction with property management
responsibilities, collects rents or attempts to collect rents for real estate
located in this state;
(L) Pays a fee, commission, or other compensation to a
licensed broker, salesperson, or property manager for referral of the name of
a prospective lessor or lessee of real property;
(M) Receives a fee, commission, or other compensation from
a licensed real estate broker, salesperson, or property management broker for
referring the name of a prospective lessor or lessee of real property; or
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(N) Advertises or represents to the public that the
individual is engaged in any of the activities referred to in this
subdivision (12);
(11)(A)(13)(A) “Real estate” means an interest in real property.
(B) “Real estate” includes without limitation a leasehold,
time-share interval, or an interest in real property that is purchased or
sold in connection with the purchase or sale of all or part of the assets,
stock, or other ownership interest of a business or other organization;
(14) “Real estate broker” means a principal broker, an executive
broker, or an associate broker;
(12)(15) “Salesperson” means an individual who:
(A) Has a salesperson's license;
(B) Is employed by a principal broker or is associated
with a principal broker as an independent contractor; and
(C) Participates in any activity described in subdivision
(10) or subdivision (12) of this section while under the supervision of a
principal broker or executive broker; and
(13)(16) “Unlicensed real estate activity” means offering or
engaging in any practice, act, or operation set forth in subdivision (10) or
subdivision (12) of this section without a valid active Arkansas license
issued by the commission.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-42-104(a)(6), concerning exemptions to
Real Estate License Law, is amended to read as follows:
(6) A person other than a property management associate employed
only at a salaried or hourly rate to engage in the leasing of real property
estate for or on behalf of a licensed principal broker, the real estate firm
of a licensed principal broker, a licensed property management broker, or an
owner of real estate, if the person:
(A) Does not otherwise engage in or offer to perform any
practice, act, or operation set forth in § 17-42-103(10) or § 17-42-103(12)
other than receiving a security deposit or payment as permitted by
subdivision (a)(6)(B)(iii) of this section; and
(B) Performs only one (1) or more of the following
functions:
(i) Delivering a lease application, lease, or an
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
amendment to a lease application or lease to any person;
(ii) Receiving a lease application, lease, or an
amendment to a lease application for delivery to the principal broker, real
estate firm, property management broker, or owner;
(iii) Receiving a security deposit, rental payment,
or any related payment for delivery to and made payable to the principal
broker, real estate firm, property management broker, or owner;
(iv) Acting under the direct written instructions of
the principal broker, real estate firm, property management broker, or owner:
(a) Showing a rental unit to any person; or
(b) Assisting in the execution of a preprinted
lease or rental agreement containing terms established by the principal
broker, real estate firm, property management broker, or owner; or
(v) Conveying information prepared by the principal
broker, real estate firm, property management broker, or owner about a lease
application, lease, the status of a security deposit, or the payment of rent
to or from any person;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-42-107(a), concerning the capacity to
sue and be sued under the Real Estate License Law, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) An action or suit shall not be instituted, nor recovery be had, in
any court of this state by any person or other legal entity for compensation
for performance of any acts described in § 17-42-103(10) or § 17-42-103(12)
unless at the time of offering to perform and performing any such act or
procuring any promise to contract for the payment of compensation for any
such contemplated act:
(1) The person holds an active license under this chapter as a
principal broker; or
(2) The person or other legal entity was the owner of the real
estate firm that contracted for or otherwise performed the acts for the
compensation that is the subject of the action or suit through either a
principal broker or a person approved by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission
under § 17-42-301(f) while licensed or approved by the commission at the time
of the acts;
(3) The person holds an active license under this chapter as a
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
property management broker; or
(4) The person or other legal entity was the owner of the
property management firm that contracted for or otherwise performed the acts
for the compensation that is the subject of the action or suit through either
a property management broker or a person approved by the commission under §
17-42-301(h) while licensed or approved by the commission at the time of the
acts.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-42-109(b), concerning civil penalties
for engaging in unlicensed real estate activity, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The fact that a person offers to engage in or offers to perform
any practice, act, or operation set forth in § 17-42-103(10) or § 17-42-
103(12) without a the appropriate license is prima facie evidence that the
person is engaged in unlicensed real estate activity.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-42-110(a), concerning the authority to
issue broker's price opinions, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A licensee real estate broker or salesperson may prepare, provide,
and collect a fee for issuing a broker's price opinion for:
(1) An existing or potential seller for the purposes of listing
and selling real estate;
(2) An existing or potential buyer of real estate;
(3) A third party making decisions or performing due diligence
related to the potential listing, offering, sale, exchange, option, lease, or
acquisition price of real estate; or
(4)(A) An existing or potential lienholder.
(B) However, a broker's price opinion prepared for an
existing or potential lienholder in conjunction with the purchase of a
buyer's principal residence shall not be used as the primary basis to
determine the value of the buyer's principal residence for the purpose of a
loan origination of a residential mortgage loan secured by the buyer's
principal residence.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 42, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
17-42-111. Rules.
The Arkansas Real Estate Commission shall promulgate rules to implement
this act.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-42-203(e), concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas Real Estate Commission, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) Shall post prominently on the commission's website a link
entitled “Property Management Licensee Information” that leads directly to
information that is helpful to existing and prospective property management
brokers and property management associates, including without limitation:
(A) Application and renewal requirements, procedures,
forms, deadlines, and related information;
(B) Commission-sponsored educational courses and materials
and other educational courses and materials; and
(C) Links to websites containing industry standards and
best practices.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-42-301(a) and (b), concerning licenses
required by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission and violations of the Real
Estate License Law, are amended to read as follows:
(a) No A person shall not practice or represent himself or herself as
a real estate broker, property management associate, property management
broker, or salesperson without first applying for and receiving a the
appropriate license to practice under this chapter.
(b) Any person who directly or indirectly for another with the
intention, or on the promise of receiving any valuable consideration, offers,
attempts, or agrees to perform any single act described in § 17-42-103(10) or
§ 17-42-103(12), whether as part of a transaction or as an entire
transaction, shall be deemed a broker, property management associate,
property management broker, or salesperson within the meaning of this
chapter.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-42-301(d), concerning license required
by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission and violations of the Real Estate
License Law, is amended to read as follows:
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(d) It shall be unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, to
act as a real estate broker, property management associate, property
management broker, or salesperson without first obtaining a the appropriate
license and otherwise complying with the provisions of this chapter.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 17-42-301(e), concerning licenses required
by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission and violations of the Real Estate
License Law, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a person or
other legal entity not licensed by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission may
own a real estate firm, provided the employees or agents employed by or
associated with the firm who perform real estate activities identified under
§ 17-42-103(10) or § 17-42-103(12) hold an active license under this chapter.
(2) The firm may enter into contracts or otherwise perform
activities identified under § 17-42-103(10) or § 17-42-103(12) only through a
principal broker and a licensee employed by or associated with the principal
broker that holds an active license issued by the commission at the time of
performing the contract or activities.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 17-42-301, concerning licenses required by
the Arkansas Real Estate Commission and violations of the Real Estate License
Law, is amended to add additional subsections to read as follows:
(g)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a person or
other legal entity not licensed by the commission may own a property
management firm, provided the employees or agents employed by or associated
with the firm who perform property management activities identified under §
17-42-103(12) hold an active license under this chapter.
(2) A firm under subdivision (g)(1) of this section may enter
into contracts or otherwise perform activities identified under § 17-42-
103(12) only through a property management broker or a licensee employed by
or associated with the property management broker who holds an active license
issued by the commission at the time of performing the contract or
activities.
(h) The commission may provide for the continuing temporary operation
of a property management firm having all rights under § 17-42-107(a) upon the
death, resignation, termination, or incapacity of the property management
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
broker or upon the closing of a property management firm, under the direction
of a person approved by the commission, subject to time limitations and other
conditions imposed by the commission.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 17-42-303 is amended to read as follows:
17-42-303. Education and experience requirements.
(a) The Arkansas Real Estate Commission shall establish education
requirements for licensure, including the standards and procedures for
approval of education programs, subject to the following conditions:
(1)(A) The most education hours required of an applicant for a
real estate broker's license shall not exceed one hundred twenty (120) hours
within the thirty-six (36) months immediately preceding the date of
application. and shall include
(B) Effective on May 1, 2014, an applicant for a broker's
license shall complete at least forty-five (45) of the required education
hours in a course developed by the commission; and
(2) The maximum number of education hours required of an
applicant for a salesperson's license shall not exceed ninety (90) hours, at
least thirty (30) hours of which shall be in the basic principles of real
estate.;
(3) The education hours required of an applicant for a property
management broker’s license shall not exceed sixty (60) hours and shall
include property management principles and practices, including without
limitation:
(A) Thirty (30) hours consisting of the following topics:
(i) Landlord-tenant law;
(ii) Federal and state fair housing laws;
(iii) The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990,
42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq;
(iv) State licensing law and rules;
(v) Trust accounts;
(vi) Accounting procedures and recordkeeping;
(vii) Contract law; and
(viii) Agency and disclosure; and
(B) Thirty (30) hours of commission property management
supervision best practices; and
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(4) The education hours required of an applicant for a property
management associate’s license shall not exceed thirty (30) hours and shall
include property management principles and practices, including without
limitation:
(A) Landlord-tenant law;
(B) Federal and state fair housing laws;
(C) The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
§ 12101 et seq;
(D) State licensing law and rules;
(E) Trust accounts;
(F) Accounting procedures and recordkeeping;
(G) Contract law; and
(H) Agency and disclosure.
(b)(1) The commission shall establish the experience requirement for
licensure for an applicant for a real estate broker's license subject to the
condition of serving an active, bona fide apprenticeship by holding a valid
salesperson's license issued by the commission or by holding a valid
salesperson's license or real estate broker's license issued by the
appropriate licensing agency of another state for a period of not less than
twenty-four (24) months within the previous forty-eight-month period
immediately preceding the date of application.
(2) However, the commission may waive the experience requirement
for a real estate broker applicant who has held an active real estate
broker's license for a period of not less than eighteen (18) months or who
has experience acceptable to the commission in a field considered real
estate-related for a period of not less than twenty-four (24) months within
the previous forty-eight-month period immediately preceding the date of
application.
(3) The experience requirement for licensure for an applicant
for a property management broker license shall be any combination of:
(A) Two (2) years of experience as a licensed property
management associate;
(B) Two (2) years of experience managing not less than
seven (7) residential or commercial units; or
(C) A total of two (2) years of a combination of the
experience in subdivisions (b)(3)(A) and (b)(3)(B) of this section.
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(c)(1) The commission shall establish a post-licensure education
requirement for individuals in their first year six (6) months of licensure
as salespersons, property management associates, property management brokers,
or real estate brokers.
(2) The commission shall not require more than thirty (30)
classroom hours of post-licensure education hours under subsection (c)(1) of
this section.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 17-42-304 is amended to read as follows:
17-42-304. Fees.
The Arkansas Real Estate Commission shall have authority to establish,
charge, and collect the following fees:
(1) An application fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00);
(2) An original real estate broker's license fee not to exceed
eighty dollars ($80.00);
(3) A real estate broker's license annual renewal fee not to
exceed eighty dollars ($80.00);
(4) An original salesperson's license fee not to exceed sixty
dollars ($60.00);
(5) A salesperson's license annual renewal fee not to exceed
sixty dollars ($60.00);
(6) A real estate broker's expired license fee not to exceed one
hundred ten dollars ($110) per year or fraction thereof;
(7) A salesperson's expired license fee not to exceed eighty
dollars ($80.00) per year or fraction thereof;
(8) An original property management broker license fee not to
exceed eighty dollars ($80.00);
(9) A property management broker license annual renewal fee not
to exceed eighty dollars ($80.00);
(10) A property management broker expired license fee not to
exceed one hundred ten dollars ($110.00) per year or fraction thereof;
(11) An original property management associate license fee not
to exceed sixty dollars ($60.00);
(12) A property management associate annual renewal fee not to
exceed sixty dollars ($60.00);
(13) A property management associate expired license fee not to
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
exceed eighty dollars ($80.00);
(14) A license reissuance fee not to exceed thirty dollars
($30.00);
(9)(15) An initial duplicate license fee not to exceed thirty
dollars ($30.00);
(10)(16) A duplicate license annual renewal fee not to exceed
thirty dollars ($30.00);
(11)(17) A transfer fee not to exceed thirty dollars ($30.00);
(12)(A)(18)(A) An examination fee not to exceed seventy-five
dollars ($75.00).
(B) However, the commission at its discretion may direct
each applicant to pay the actual costs of the examination fee directly to a
testing service engaged by the commission to administer the examination;
(13)(19) Pursuant to § 17-42-313, an appeal filing fee not to
exceed one hundred dollars ($100);
(14)(20) A Real Estate Recovery Fund fee not to exceed twenty-
five dollars ($25.00); and
(15)(21) The actual cost of a state and federal criminal history
background check.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 17-42-306 is amended to read as follows:
17-42-306. Application procedure — Licensing examination required.
(a)(1) Applications for licensure shall be submitted on forms provided
by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission.
(2) The commission may require any information and documentation
needed to determine if the applicant meets the criteria for licensure as
provided in this chapter.
(3) Each applicant shall pay an application fee and examination
fee as the commission may require under § 17-42-304.
(4)(A) Applicants that have provided all required information
and documentation to the commission may sit for the licensing examination, if
a request has been sent to the Identification Bureau of the Department
Division of Arkansas State Police for a state and federal criminal background
check.
(B) A real estate license shall not be issued until the
applicant has successfully completed the licensing examination and the
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
commission receives and approves the state and federal criminal background
check.
(b)(1)(A) An applicant who successfully completes the licensing
examination shall pay, within ninety (90) days from the date of the licensing
examination, such license fee and Real Estate Recovery Fund fee as the
commission may require under § 17-42-304.
(B)(i) If the federal criminal background check has not
been received by the commission within ninety (90) days of the date of the
licensing examination, the date may be extended by the commission until
receipt of the federal criminal background check.
(ii) A real estate license shall not be issued until
receipt and approval by the commission of the state and federal criminal
background checks.
(2) The applicant's failure to pay the license fee and Real
Estate Recovery Fund fee within the ninety-day period under subdivision
(b)(1)(A) of this section shall invalidate the licensing examination results,
and the applicant shall be required to make new application and retake the
licensing examination as an original applicant.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 17-42-307(b)(4), concerning license
expiration and renewal under the Real Estate License Law, is amended to read
as follows:
(4) Effective September 30, 2019, the The commission may
promulgate rules to add additional hours of continuing education to the
annual amount required under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section with no
statutory maximum for hours of continuing education.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 17-42-307(c)-(f), concerning license
expiration and renewal under the Real Estate License Law, are amended to read
as follows:
(c)(1) A property management broker or property management associate
shall complete annually:
(A) Not less than six (6) hours nor more than seven (7)
classroom hours of continuing education required by the commission, with at
least one (1) classroom hour focusing on safety;
(B) The distance education equivalent of subdivision
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(c)(1)(A) of this section required by the commission; or
(C) A course that the commission has determined to
demonstrate mastery of an acceptable property management subject.
(2) A licensee who satisfies subdivision (c)(1) of this section
completes the continuing education requirements for the licensing year.
(3) If a licensee files for renewal of a license but fails to
provide proof of continuing education, the licensee's license is inactive
until proof is provided to the commission.
(d)(1) To renew or reactivate a license, a licensee shall complete the
number of classroom hours of continuing education or the distance education
equivalent of continuing education required by the commission for each
inactive year not to exceed a total of thirty (30) classroom hours.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(1)(d)(1) of this
section, a person is not subject to the education requirements of this
section while the person's license is inactive.
(3) The commission may waive all or part of the requirements of
subdivision (c)(1)(d)(1) of this section if a licensee is unable to complete
the continuing education due to extenuating circumstances.
(d)(1)(e)(1) For each active licensee, the commission shall issue a
new license for each ensuing renewal period in the absence of a reason or
condition that may warrant the refusal of a license, upon receipt of the:
(A) Written request for license renewal at least ninety
(90) days before the expiration of the license upon forms provided by the
commission; and
(B) Renewal fee.
(2)(A) A broker, or salesperson, property management associate,
or property management broker who does not wish to engage in the real estate
or property management business may renew a license on inactive status in the
absence of a reason or condition that may warrant the refusal of a license
upon receipt of the:
(i) Written request of the applicant at least ninety
(90) days before the expiration of the license upon forms provided by the
commission; and
(ii) Renewal fee.
(B) The commission may limit the number of renewal periods
in which a license may be renewed on inactive status.
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(C) The renewal fee for inactive status is the same as for
renewal of an active license.
(3) An application for renewal filed after the date established
by the commission to renew a license is treated as an application to renew an
expired license.
(e)(f) If a person to whom a valid license has been issued permits the
license to expire for a period not in excess of that established by the
commission, the commission shall issue to the person a current license
without requiring the person to submit to an examination if the person
furnishes the information required by the commission, including proof of
completion of appropriate continuing education requirements, and pays the fee
required by the commission.
(f)(1)(g)(1) New salesperson, property management associate, property
management broker, and real estate broker licensees shall complete post-
licensure education under § 17-42-303(c).
(2) If the licensee fails to complete the post-licensure
education requirements within twelve (12) six (6) months after the date the
license was issued, the commission shall place the license on inactive status
until the commission receives documentation that the licensee has completed
the post-licensure education requirements.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 17-42-308(a)(2), concerning an inactive
license under the Real Estate License Law, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The holder of an inactive license shall not practice as a
real estate broker, or salesperson, property management associate, or
property management broker in this state without first activating the
license.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 17-42-309, concerning a place of business,
is amended to add additional subsections to read as follows:
(c) Every property management broker shall maintain a place of
business and shall display a sign that is permanently attached to the
building bearing the name under which the property management broker conducts
his or her property management business and the words “property management”,
“rentals”, “leasing”, or other words approved by the commission that clearly
indicate to the public that the property management broker is engaged in the
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
property management business.
(d)(1) If a property management broker maintains a branch office, a
duplicate license shall be issued upon payment by the property management
broker of the initial fee and, thereafter, such renewal fee as the commission
may require under § 17-42-304.
(2) However, a duplicate license shall not be issued for a
branch office at which property management associates are assigned unless the
property management broker establishing the branch office has designated
another property management broker with the firm to supervise the property
management associates.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 17-42-310(c)–(e), concerning the names and
affiliations of licensees under the Real Estate License Law, are amended to
read as follows:
(c) The licenses of the principal broker or property management broker
and all licensees employed by or associated with him or her shall be retained
by the principal broker or property management broker and conspicuously
displayed in his or her place of business.
(d)(1) Upon the termination of a licensee's employment by or
association with a principal broker or property management broker, the
licensee shall promptly deliver his or her pocket card to the principal
broker or property management broker, and the principal broker or property
management broker shall promptly notify the commission of the termination and
return to the commission the license and pocket card of the terminated
licensee, which shall automatically inactivate the license.
(2) If the pocket card is unavailable, the principal broker or
property management broker shall promptly so notify the commission in
writing.
(e) A license inactivated under this section may be transferred to
another principal broker or property management broker upon application of
the licensee, payment of the relevant fee, and submission of a statement that
he or she is not taking any listings, management contracts, appraisals, lease
agreements, or copies of any such documents or any other pertinent
information belonging to the licensee’s previous principal broker, property
management broker, or firm.

03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 17-42-311(a)(9)–(13), concerning
violations under the Real Estate License Law, are amended to read as follows:
(9) Acting as a broker or, salesperson, property management
associate, or property management broker while not licensed with a principal
broker or property management broker, representing or attempting to represent
a broker other than the principal broker or property management broker with
whom he or she is affiliated without the express knowledge and consent of the
principal broker or property management broker, or representing himself or
herself as a salesperson or having a contractual relationship similar to that
of a salesperson with anyone other than a licensed principal broker, or
representing himself or herself as a property management associate or having
a contractual relationship similar to that of a property management associate
with anyone other than a licensed property management broker;
(10) Advertising in a false, misleading, or deceptive manner;
(11) Being unworthy or incompetent to act as a property
management associate, property management broker, real estate broker, or
salesperson in such a manner as to safeguard the interests of the public;
(12) Paying a commission or valuable consideration to any person
for acts or services performed in violation of this chapter, including paying
a commission or other valuable consideration to an unlicensed person for
participation in a real estate auction; and
(13) While licensed only as a property management broker or
property management associate, participating in or accepting anything of
value for the listing, negotiation, or sale of real estate that is not owned
by the property management broker or property management associate, including
without limitation real estate managed by a property management broker or
property management associate; and
(14) Any other conduct, whether of the same or a different
character from that specified in this section, which constitutes improper,
fraudulent, or dishonest dealing.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 17-42-312(a)(1), concerning investigation
of complaints, citations, and penalties under the Real Estate License Law, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Arkansas Real Estate Commission may, on its own motion, and
shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, provided that
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
the complaint and any evidence, documentary or otherwise, presented in
connection therewith shall make out a prima facie case, investigate the
actions of any person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a
real estate broker, or real estate salesperson, property management
associate, or property management broker regardless of whether the
transaction was for his or her own account or in his or her capacity as a
broker, or salesperson, property management associate, or property management
broker.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 17-42-312(d)(1)(A) and (B), concerning
investigation of complaints, citations, and penalties under the Real Estate
License Law, are amended to read as follows:
(A) A penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100)
to a broker, or salesperson, property management associate, or property
management broker who:
(i) Fails to complete annual education requirements;
or
(ii) Fails to complete post-licensure education
requirements by the established deadline; or
(B) A penalty of not more than two hundred fifty dollars
($250) to a broker, salesperson, property management associate, property
management broker, or the supervising broker of a broker, or salesperson, or
property management broker if a broker, or salesperson, property management
associate, or property management broker:
(i) Performs activities that require an active real
estate license while his or her license is expired; or
(ii) Advertises, publishes, or otherwise distributes
information about real property, or real estate brokerage, or property
management business or activities in violation of this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 17-42-313(a), concerning complaints and
appeals before the Arkansas Real Estate Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) Any person whose complaint against a licensed real estate broker,
or salesperson, property management associate, or property management broker
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
is dismissed by the Executive Director of the Arkansas Real Estate Commission
without a hearing may appeal the dismissal to the Arkansas Real Estate
Commission subject to and in accordance with the following provisions:
(1) The request for appeal must be in writing and received in
the office of the commission not later than sixty (60) days following the
date of dismissal by the executive director;
(2) The request for appeal must be accompanied by such filing
fee as the commission may require pursuant to § 17-42-304; and
(3)(A)(i) The appellant must also pay the cost of preparing the
record for the commission's review, which cost shall be determined by the
commission.
(ii)(a) The costs must be paid by the appellant
within thirty (30) days after notification of the amount.
(b) Otherwise, the appeal shall be dismissed.
(B) However, if the commission's review results in a
hearing being ordered on the complaint, both the filing fee and the cost of
preparing the record shall be refunded to the appellant.
(C) Any person who is indigent and unable to pay either
the filing fee or the cost of the record, or both, may file a pauper's oath
in such form as required by the commission, and, if the commission determines
that the appellant is indeed indigent, the filing fee or cost of the record,
or both, shall be waived.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 17-42-314(b), concerning hearings under
the Real Estate License Law, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Except in cases in which a licensee has obtained a license by
false or fraudulent representation, the Arkansas Real Estate Commission shall
not investigate the actions of or conduct any disciplinary hearing regarding
any real estate broker, or salesperson, property management associate, or
property management broker unless the complaint is filed or the investigation
initiated within three (3) years from the date of the actions complained of
or concerning which an investigation is initiated.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 17-42-501 is amended as follows:
17-42-501. Real estate education program.
(a) The Arkansas Real Estate Commission shall establish an education
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
program for real estate brokers, salespersons, and property management
licensees to ensure that education is available and accessible to an
applicant or a licensee.
(b) The education program is intended to fulfill the education
requirements for a real estate broker, salesperson, or property management
license and to provide real estate and property management courses intended
to fulfill the education requirements for a real estate broker, salesperson,
or property management license.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 17-42-502(3)-(5), concerning definitions
under the education programs of the Real Estate License Law, are amended to
read as follows:
(3) "Approved course" means a course of instruction approved by
the commission that satisfies the education requirements for prelicense
education, postlicense education, or continuing education for a real estate
license issued by the commission;
(4) "Associate instructor" means a person who is licensed by the
commission to teach real estate or property management courses while under
the supervision of an administrator or principal instructor that satisfy the
education requirements for a real estate license issued by the commission;
(5) "Association license" means a license granted by the
commission to a real estate trade or professional association offering
approved education that satisfies education requirements for a real estate
license issued by the commission;

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 17-42-502(12)-(14), concerning definitions
under the education programs of the Real Estate License Law, are amended to
read as follows:
(12) "Nonqualified offering" means a course in real estate
education that has not been approved by the commission but is offered to
persons intending to apply for a real estate license issued by the
commission;
(13) “Postlicense education” means real estate or property
management education required to be successfully completed within a time
frame established by the commission after a real estate or property
management license is issued;
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(14) “Prelicense education” means real estate or property
management education required to be successfully completed by an applicant
before sitting for the examination for a broker or salesperson license issued
by the commission;

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 17-42-502(15)(B)(iv) and (v), concerning
definitions under the education programs of the Real Estate License Law, are
amended to read as follows:
(iv) Advertise as being engaged in the business of
offering real estate or property management education courses; and
(v) Charge tuition and fees for real estate or
property management education courses;

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 17-42-502(17) and (18), concerning
definitions under the education programs of the Real Estate License Law, are
amended to read as follows:
(17) "School license" means a license granted by the commission
to a proprietary education institution offering education courses approved by
the commission that fulfill mandatory education requirements for attaining or
maintaining a real estate license issued by the commission; and
(18) "Student" means an applicant or licensee who attends real
estate or property management education courses approved by the commission.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 17-42-503(b), concerning exemptions to the
course approval authority of the Arkansas Real Estate Commission, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) The requirement for course approval by the Arkansas Real Estate
Commission under this subchapter does not apply to:
(1) A classroom course in a real estate-related subject
identified by the commission as an approved topic if it is offered by the
National Association of Realtors, the National Association of Real Estate
Brokers, or other associated entities;
(2) A course of at least three (3) semester hours or equivalent
in a real estate or property management subject that is approved by the
commission and offered by an accredited college or university;
(3) A course in a property management or real estate-related
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
subject offered by the commission;
(4) A course or a conference in a property management or real
estate-related subject approved by the commission and offered annually on a
limited basis in Arkansas; or
(5) A course that is not used to fulfill the education
requirements of this subchapter for attaining a real estate or property
management license.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 17-42-504(c), concerning requirements to
provide real estate education courses under the Real Estate License Law, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) On and after June 1, 2026, a person shall not practice as a
provider of property management education for property management licensure
unless the commission approves that education practitioner as a subject
matter expert in the field of property management or that person holds a
property management broker license issued by the commission.
(d) A person or school shall not represent that an offered property
management course satisfies the education requirements for property
management licensure unless the course is approved by the commission.
(e)(1) It is a violation of this subchapter to fail to obtain:
(A) A license to practice as a provider of real estate
education for real estate licensure; or
(B) Approval for a real estate education course by the
commission;
(C) A license to practice as a provider of property
management education for property management licensure; or
(D) Approval for a property management education course by
the commission.
(2) A real estate or property management education course
offered in violation of this subchapter is a nonqualified offering.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 17-42-506 is amended to read as follows:
17-42-506. Powers and duties.
(a) The Arkansas Real Estate Commission may adopt rules as necessary
to implement this subchapter.
(b) The commission shall license, approve, and regulate schools,
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
associations, principal instructors, and associate instructors offering
commission-approved prelicense, postlicense, and continuing education courses
offered to satisfy education requirements for real estate licensure under
this chapter.
(c) The commission shall establish the licensing or education
requirements for:
(1) A school or association that applies for a license to offer
real estate courses that satisfy the education requirements for real estate
licensure under this chapter;
(2) Principal and associate instructors of courses approved by
the commission;
(3) Courses that satisfy the education requirements for
applicants for real estate licensure and under this chapter, real estate
licensees, and property management licensees; and
(4) Guest speakers of courses approved by the commission.
(d) The commission shall:
(1) Establish procedural guidelines for licensed schools and
their locations and those providing real estate or property management
education designed for students to meet the education requirements for a real
estate license or property management license issued by the commission;
(2) Charge fees and pay the necessary expenses to develop,
approve, sponsor, contract for, or conduct real estate or property management
courses and seminars for real estate or property management licensees or
instructors of real estate or property management education;
(3) Maintain in electronic format a list of the names of real
estate approved schools, associations, administrators, instructors, and
courses approved under this subchapter;
(4) Publish in electronic format the names of the persons,
associations, or schools that have been sanctioned by formal hearing or
consent order under this subchapter;
(5) Periodically monitor courses offered or taught by the
licensed schools and instructors; and
(6) Establish course requirements with respect to:
(A) Accessibility;
(B) Attendance;
(C) Satisfactory completion; and
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(D) Curricula; and
(E) Student license or applicant type.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 17-42-513(a), concerning the approval of
courses and course content by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission, is amended
to read as follows:
(a) Except for courses exempted in § 17-42-503(b), a real estate or
property management course that is intended to satisfy the education
requirements for a real estate or property management license issued by the
Arkansas Real Estate Commission shall first be approved by the Arkansas Real
Estate Commission commission.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 17-42-514(a)(1), concerning curricula
required by the Real Estate License Law, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Require not less than six (6) nor more than seven (7)
classroom hours of continuing education for licensees under § 17-42-307;

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 17-42-514(a), concerning curricula
required by the Real Estate License Law, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(6) Develop and require a specific curriculum for continuing
education courses for property management associates and property management
broker licensees.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 17-42-514 is amended to read as follows:
17-42-514. Curricula.
(a) The Arkansas Real Estate Commission may:
(1) Require not less than six (6) nor more than seven (7)
classroom hours of continuing education for licensees;
(2) Identify subject matter topics for continuing education
courses;
(3) Identify a specific topic of not more than three (3)
classroom hours to be included in the annual continuing education
requirement;
(4) Develop and require a specific curriculum for continuing
education courses for licensed brokers or their designees; and
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(5) Identify subject matter topics for which licensed schools
and instructors may develop courses that fulfill the annual continuing
education requirements.
(b)(1) The commission may develop the curricula for prelicense and
postlicense education.
(2) Prelicense and postlicense courses that are intended to
satisfy the education requirements for a property management license shall be
approved by the commission for participation and attendance by applicants for
property management licensure.
(3) Prelicense and postlicense courses that are intended to
satisfy the education requirements for a real estate license shall only be
approved by the commission for participation and attendance by applicants for
a real estate license.

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 17-42-515 is amended to read as follows:
17-42-515. Violations.
An applicant for a real estate educator license or a licensee under
this chapter is subject to disciplinary action under this subchapter if the
applicant for a real estate educator license or a licensee pleads guilty or
nolo contendere to or is found guilty of any of the following:
(1) Obtaining a real estate educator license an instructor
license, school license, or real estate education course approval by fraud,
misrepresentation, or concealment;
(2) Violating this subchapter, the rules adopted by the Arkansas
Real Estate Commission, or an order issued by the commission;
(3) Committing an act, a felony, or a crime involving moral
turpitude, fraud, dishonesty, untruthfulness, or untrustworthiness regardless
of whether the imposition of the sentence has been deferred or suspended;
(4) Engaging or allowing unlawful discriminatory practices;
(5) Violating the requirements of the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., regarding access to and
delivery of real estate or property management education courses;
(6) Issuing or reporting a false certificate of completion for a
real estate or property management education course;
(7) Teaching a course in a way that instructs licensees to
engage in unlawful or noncompliant activities;
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(8) Failing to monitor attendance of students to ensure
satisfactory completion of real estate or property management education
courses approved by the commission;
(9) Utilizing an instructor or guest speaker who does not meet
the requirements of this subchapter;
(10) Making a substantial misrepresentation of a material fact
to the commission;
(11) Advertising in a false, misleading, or deceptive way;
(12) Being unworthy or incompetent to act or operate as a real
estate education school or association or a real estate educator; or
(13) Refusing or failing to make available to the commission for
inspection the records required to be maintained by a principal instructor or
administrator;
(14) Refusing or failing to cooperate with an investigation
commenced by the commission under this chapter; or
(15) Engaging in other conduct that constitutes improper,
fraudulent, or dishonest dealing.

SECTION 39. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Change of heading for
Title 17, Chapter 42, Subchapter 5.
The Code Revisor shall change the heading of Title 17, Chapter 42,
Subchapter 5 from “Renewal of Licenses” To “Real Estate and Property
Management Education”.

SECTION 40. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules implementing this act.
(a)(1) When adopting the initial rules to implement this act, the
final rules shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under §
25-15-204(f):
(A) On or before June 1, 2026; or
(B) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by June
1, 2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(2) The Arkansas Real Estate Commission shall file the proposed
rules with the Legislative Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in
advance of June 1, 2026, so that the Legislative Council may consider the
rule for approval before June 1, 2026.
(b) The General Assembly finds that:
03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 HB1558
(1) Each of the existing rules of the commission is necessary
for the efficient operation of the commission; and
(2) The repeal of any of the commission's rules would cause
unnecessary hardship and may render the commission unable to fully discharge
its duties and responsibilities.


/s/McGrew




























03-05-2025 14:46:18 LGL025